California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20843.

Failure to give notice of the final hearing shall not affect the validity of subsequent proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20844.

On a final hearing the board of supervisors may adjourn from time to time, but at no time for a longer period than three days, until a determination of the matter is reached.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20845.

At the final hearing the board of supervisors shall determine the land to be formed into the proposed district:

(a) Land shall be excluded which will not in the judgment of the board of supervisors be benefited by the project.

(b) No land included by the petition in the proposed district or in the modified project as the case may be which is susceptible of irrigation from any of the proposed, or if modified, the modified sources shall be excluded unless the owner consents to the exclusion.

(c) Riparian land and land already subject to irrigation may be included if in the judgment of the board of supervisors, it will either be benefited or the rights to the water used on it should be acquired by the proposed district.

(d) Land not included in the original formation petition, susceptible of irrigation from any of the proposed sources, may in the discretion of the board of supervisors be included on application by its owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20846.

At the final hearing no evidence shall be heard against the genuineness or sufficiency of the petition or notice unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the board of supervisors that new evidence which if uncontradicted would disprove the genuineness or sufficiency of the petition or notice has been discovered since the board adopted the preliminary formation resolution. In case any new evidence is admitted, full opportunity shall be given for the introduction of evidence in rebuttal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20847.

At the conclusion of the final hearing on the petition the board of supervisors shall make an order containing all of the following:

(a) Reaffirmance, when it is consistent with its conclusions, of the sufficiency of the petition and of the notice of the preliminary hearing.

(b) Recital that a report on the proposed district has been made by the department if it was in fact made, and if that be so, that it is on file in the records of the board.

(c) Description of the land as determined by the board.

(d) Name for the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

20848.

The order on final hearing shall also contain all of the following:

(a) Division of the district into the following number of divisions, which shall be as nearly equal in size as may be practicable:

(1) Five divisions unless otherwise requested, numbered from one to five respectively.

(2) Three divisions when requested in the petition, numbered from one to three respectively.

(b) Statement, when requested in the petition, that the directors of the proposed district are to be elected at large.

(c) Statement, when and as requested in the petition, of the consolidated district offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20849.

The order on final hearing shall be entered in full upon the minutes of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20850.

A finding of the board of supervisors in favor of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and notice shall be conclusive against all persons except the State upon suit by the Attorney General commenced within one year after the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Election on Formation [20890. - 20938.]



  ARTICLE 1. Calling of Election [20890. - 20896.]

20890.

Upon making the order on final hearing of the formation petition, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of a formation election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not it shall be formed and electing persons to fill the offices of the proposed district if it is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20891.

The notice of the formation election shall contain:

(a) Date and hours of election.

(b) Place of polls in each precinct.

(c) Description of the land.

(d) Name of the proposed district.

(e) Offices for which candidates shall be elected at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20892.

Notice of the formation election shall be published once a week for three weeks previous to the election, in a newspaper published in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20893.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

20894.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

20895.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

20896.

(a) The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

(b) The ballot pamphlet printed and mailed pursuant to this section shall contain all of the following in the order prescribed:

(1) The complete text of the proposition.

(2) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(3) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(4) The argument against the proposed district formation.

(c) The election officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 225.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conduct of Election [20910. - 20916.]

20910.

For the purposes of the formation election the board of supervisors shall establish a convenient number of election precincts in the proposed district and define their boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20911.

The precinct board for the formation election shall be appointed, candidates for the offices of the proposed district shall be nominated, ballots and other supplies shall be provided and the election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions concerning general elections except as to:

(a) Notice of the election.

(b) Nominating petitions, which may be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors not less than 15 days before the election.

(c) Mailing of sample ballots, which mailing to each voter entitled to vote at the election, as determined by the county elections official, shall be completed at least three whole days before the election.

(d) Other inconsistent provisions in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 153.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20912.

The board of supervisors shall act in place of the board, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall act in place of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20913.

At the formation election the elective officers of the district shall be elected, but only one person shall be elected to fill the offices consolidated, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20914.

On the ballots provided for the formation election shall be printed a proposition substantially as follows: “Shall the proposed ____ Irrigation District be formed?” followed by the words “Yes” and “No” with inclosed voting spaces thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20915.

The board of supervisors shall meet on the second Monday following the formation election to canvass the votes cast, and only if upon the canvass it appears that a majority of all the votes cast at the formation election are “Irrigation District—Yes” shall the board canvass the votes for the candidates for the district offices and declare the persons receiving respectively the highest number of votes to be elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20916.

No informalities in the conduct of the formation election or in any related matters shall invalidate the election or the result if notice was given substantially as provided and the election was fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contest of Election [20930. - 20938.]

20930.

The formation election may be contested by any person owning property liable to assessment within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20931.

No contest shall be brought more than 20 days after the canvass of the vote of the election by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20932.

The directors elected at the formation election shall be parties defendant in an election contest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20933.

The election contest shall be brought in the superior court of the county where the formation proceedings were had.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20934.

If more than one contest is pending, they shall be consolidated and tried together.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20935.

The court shall speedily try the election contest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20936.

The determination of the election contest shall be based on whether or not the election was conducted fairly and in substantial compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Judgment shall be entered accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20937.

An appeal may be taken by any party to an election contest within 30 days from entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20938.

The appeal shall be heard and determined within 60 days from the time of filing the notice of appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Establishment of District [20960. - 20963.]

20960.

If upon the canvass of the formation election it appears that a majority of all the votes cast are “Irrigation District—Yes,” the board of supervisors shall by an order entered on its minutes declare the territory formed as a district under the name designated for it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20961.

The board of supervisors shall immediately file for record in the office of the county recorder of each affected county a certified copy of the order declaring the district formed and shall also immediately forward a copy to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20962.

From the filing for record of the order declaring the district formed the formation of the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20962.5.

The county clerk of the principal county shall immediately file with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the county clerk may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

20963.

The board of supervisors of any county in which any land embraced in a district is situated shall not after its formation allow another district to be formed including any portion of the same land without the consent of the board of the district in which the land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Change of Name [20980. - 20982.]

20980.

Whenever the board so determines it may, or in the event any district has been formed under the same name as that of another district, the board of the last formed district shall, by a resolution spread on its minutes change the name of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 581.)
-------------------------------------------

20980.5.

The Palmdale Irrigation District may change its name pursuant to this chapter to the Palmdale Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

20980.6.

The Helix Irrigation District may change its name pursuant to this chapter to the Helix Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

20981.

Certified copies of the resolution changing the name of the district shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each affected county and sent to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

20982.

The change of name shall become effective for all purposes upon the recordation of the resolution after which the district shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, be responsible for its obligations and in all respects conduct its affairs under its name as changed with the same force and effect as under the name by which it was designated upon its formation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 581.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [21100. - 21405.]



  CHAPTER 1. Officers [21100. - 21196.]



  ARTICLE 1. Qualification and Tenure [21100. - 21104.]

21100.

(a) Each director, except as otherwise provided in this division, shall be a voter and a landowner in the district and a resident of the division that he or she represents at the time of his or her nomination or appointment and through his or her entire term, except in the case of the director elected at a formation election. A director elected at a formation election shall be a resident, landowner, and voter in the proposed district at the time of his or her nomination and a resident of the division that he or she represents during his or her entire term.

(b) In any district having no more than 15 landowners who are voters in the district, a person need not be a voter but shall be qualified to be a director of the district if he or she is a landowner of the district at the time of his or her nomination or appointment and during his or her entire term.

(c) In a district providing retail electricity for residents of the district, each director, except as otherwise provided in this division, shall be a voter of the district and a resident of the division that he or she represents at the time of his or her nomination or appointment and during his or her entire term, except in the case of a director elected at a formation election. A director elected at a formation election shall be a resident in the proposed district at the time of his or her nomination and a resident of the division that he or she represents during his or her entire term.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 21100, except as provided in paragraph (2), for the purpose of meeting the requirements of that subdivision, a person need not be a landowner within the district to be qualified to be a director of the district if either of the following applies:

(A) The person serves or seeks to serve on the board of directors of a district without divisions and the district is required to submit an urban water management plan pursuant to the Urban Water Management Planning Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) of Division 6).

(B) The person serves or seeks to serve on the board of directors of a district with divisions, the district is required to submit an urban water management plan pursuant to the Urban Water Management Planning Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) of Division 6), and the district, within the division that the person represents or seeks to represent, supplies water as a public water system subject to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116270) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A director appointed or elected before January 1, 2007, shall be subject to the qualification requirements imposed by subdivision (a) until the expiration of his or her term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 240.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.2.

(a) This section applies to the Pixley Irrigation District.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21100, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that authorizes a person who meets only the landownership requirement of Section 21100 to be a director of the district.

(c) Notwithstanding the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the registered voters in the district may request, in writing, that all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request be required to meet all of the requirements of Section 21100. The request shall be submitted to the directors.

(d) If the directors determine that at least 25 percent of the registered voters in the district have signed the request submitted pursuant to subdivision (c), all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request shall meet all of the requirements of Section 21100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 11, Sec. 1.   Effective February 23, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.3.

(a) This section only applies to the Tulelake Irrigation District. For the purpose of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Corporation” means any legal entity, public or private, properly organized under the laws of the state in which it was created, that is allowed to own real property in California.

(2) “District” means the Tulelake Irrigation District, originally formed as Tule Lake Irrigation District.

(3) “Legal representative” means the person authorized to act for purposes of this section for or on behalf of a corporation, estate, or trust holding title to land within the district.

(4) “Residency area” means land within the district or land within one mile of any district boundary.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 21100, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that authorizes a person to be a director if the person, at the time of his or her nomination or appointment and through his or her entire term, meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is a registered voter in California.

(2) Resides within the residency area.

(3) Is an owner of real property within the division he or she represents or the owner’s legal representative.

(c) Notwithstanding the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the registered voters in the district may request, in writing, that all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request be required to meet all of the requirements of Section 21100. The request shall be submitted to the board of directors.

(d) If the board of directors determines that at least 25 percent of the registered voters in the district have signed the request submitted pursuant to subdivision (c), all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the
 request shall meet all of the requirements of Section 21100.

(e) Before a legal representative may declare his or her candidacy or be appointed to serve as a director under this section, he or she shall present to the district a copy of his or her authority that shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election or the certificate of appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 377, Sec. 1.   (AB 1816)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.4.

(a) This section applies to the Hills Valley Irrigation District.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21100, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that authorizes a person who meets only the landownership requirement of Section 21100 to be a director of the district.

(c) Notwithstanding the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the registered voters in the district may request, in writing, that all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request be required to meet all of the requirements of Section 21100. The request shall be submitted to the directors.

(d) If the directors determine that at least 25 percent of the registered voters in the district have signed the request submitted pursuant to subdivision (c), all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request shall meet all of the requirements of Section 21100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   Effective February 23, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.5.

(a) This section applies to the Stratford Irrigation District.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21100, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that authorizes a person who meets the landownership requirement of Section 21100 and resides in Kings County to be a director of the district.

(c) Notwithstanding the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the registered voters in the district may request, in writing, that all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request be required to meet all of the requirements of Section 21100. The request shall be submitted to the directors.

(d) If the directors determine that at least 25 percent of the registered voters in the district have signed the request submitted pursuant to subdivision (c), all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request shall meet all of the requirements of Section 21100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.6.

(a) This section applies to the Byron-Bethany Irrigation District.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 21100, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that authorizes a person who meets the landownership requirement of Section 21100 and resides in the County of Alameda, Contra Costa, or San Joaquin to be a director of the district.

(2) Notwithstanding the adoption of a resolution pursuant to paragraph (1), the registered voters in the district may request, in writing, that all of the directors who are elected subsequent to the receipt of the request be required to meet all of the requirements of Section 21100. The request shall be submitted to the directors.

(3) If the directors determine that at least 25 percent of the registered voters in the district have signed the request submitted pursuant to paragraph (2), all of the directors who are elected subsequent to the receipt of the request shall meet all of the requirements of Section 21100.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 21552, 21553, and 21554, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that requires the election of directors by division. The proposed division boundaries shall be made available upon request and at the public hearing described in subdivision (d). Division boundaries shall be established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 21605) of Chapter 1 of Part 4.

(d) (1) Before considering the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), the board of directors shall provide at least 45 days’ notice of the public hearing at which the board proposes to act on the resolution. The notice of the public hearing shall be given by placing a display advertisement of at least one-eighth page in a newspaper of general circulation for three weeks pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code and by first-class mailing to each voter, postage prepaid, in the United States mail and shall be deemed given when so deposited. The public hearing shall be held at least 45 days after the mailing pursuant to this subdivision. The envelope or the cover of the mailing shall include the name of the local agency and the return address of the sender. This mailed notice shall be in at least 10-point type and be given to all registered voters in the district.

(2) The notice required by paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A statement that the board of directors will consider a resolution authorizing a person who only meets the landownership requirement of Section 21100 to be a director of the district, or a statement that the board of directors will consider a resolution that requires the election of directors by division.

(B) The address to which registered voters may mail a protest against the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c).

(C) The phone number and address of an individual that interested persons may contact to receive additional information about the resolution.

(D) A statement that a protest by 10 percent of the registered voters will prevent the adoption of the resolution by the board of directors and that the board of directors are prohibited from considering the adoption of such a resolution for at least four years.

(E) The date, time, and location of the public hearing.

(e) (1) Prior to the public hearing, any voter may submit to the board of directors a written protest against the adoption of a proposed resolution pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c). The protest shall be in writing and shall identify the registered voter.

(2) If the board of directors finds that the protest made by the registered voters in the district represents more than 10 percent of the total number of registered voters in the district, and the protests are not withdrawn so as to reduce the percentage to less than 10 percent, the board of directors shall not adopt the resolution and shall not consider the adoption of such a resolution for at least four years.

(f) A resolution shall not be adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) less than 180 days before a general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1134, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.7.

The landownership requirements set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 21100 do not apply to the South Bay Irrigation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   (AB 348)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.8.

(a) This section only applies to the South Fork Irrigation District. For the purpose of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Corporation” means any legal entity, public or private, properly organized under the laws of the state in which it was created, that is allowed to own real property in California.

(2) “District” means the South Fork Irrigation District.

(3) “Legal representative” means the person authorized to act for purposes of this section for or on behalf of a corporation, estate, or trust holding title to land within the
 district.

(4) “Residency area” means land within the district or land within five miles of any district boundary.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 21100, the board of directors of the district may adopt a resolution that authorizes a person to be a director if the person, at the time of the person’s nomination or appointment and through the person’s entire term, meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is a registered voter in California.

(2) Resides within the residency area.

(3) Is an owner of real property within the division the person represents or the owner’s legal representative.

(c) Notwithstanding
 the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), the registered voters in the district may request, in writing, that all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request be required to meet all of the requirements of Section 21100. The request shall be submitted to the board of directors.

(d) If the board of directors determines that at least 25 percent of the registered voters in the district have signed the request submitted pursuant to subdivision (c), all of the directors who are appointed or elected subsequent to the receipt of the request shall meet all of the requirements of Section 21100.

(e) Before a legal representative may declare the legal representative’s candidacy or be appointed to serve as a director under this section, the person shall present to the district a copy of that person’s authority that shall be kept and
 filed with the returns of the election or the certificate of appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   (SB 692)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.

Notwithstanding Sections 10505 and 10554 of the Elections Code, elective officers, irrespective of the method of their selection, take office as soon as they qualify, except that officers elected at a general district election take office at noon on the first Friday in December next following the general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 226.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.

Prior to the first Friday in December next following the general district election each elective officer shall take and subscribe the official oath and file it in the office of the district and execute the bond required of him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 26.1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21104.

The term of office of each elective officer subsequent to the officers elected at the formation election is four years or until his successor qualifies and takes office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Consolidation and Segregation [21120. - 21124.]

21120.

A board may consolidate any two or more of the offices of assessor, collector, and treasurer. The board may consolidate any two or more of the positions of secretary, engineer, manager, assistant engineer or assistant manager, and may combine any one or more of these positions with the offices of assessor, collector or treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

21121.

The order of consolidation shall be made at least 120 days prior to a general election and shall take effect at said election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21122.

A board may at least 120 days before a general district election segregate consolidated offices, and each office so segregated shall be filled at said election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21123.

A board may, at least 90 days before a general district election, determine that the offices of assessor, collector, or treasurer or any of them shall be filled by appointment by the board to serve at its pleasure rather than being filled by election. A person so appointed need not be a resident or elector of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

21124.

A board may, at least 90 days before a general district election, determine that the offices of assessor, collector, or treasurer or any of them that are currently appointive shall be filled by election at the next succeeding district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Official Bonds [21141. - 21147.]

21141.

When not otherwise provided by the board the bonds to be given by the following officers shall be in the following sums:

(a) Assessor: Five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) Collector: Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(c) Treasurer: One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21142.

The board may fix the bonds to be given by the following officers and persons to suit the conditions of the district within the following sums:

(a) Treasurer: Five thousand dollars ($5,000) to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) Collector: Five thousand dollars ($5,000) to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(c) Secretary: Any sum.

(d) Custodian of a special fund: Any sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21142.5.

If the offices of assessor, collector, and treasurer in any district are held by one person, the board may fix one bond to cover all three offices within the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 581.)
-------------------------------------------

21143.

All bonds shall be in the form prescribed for the official bonds of county officers, and the premiums may be paid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21145.

All bonds shall be approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 771, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21146.

Each officer herein named shall be liable upon his bond for his wilful violation of any express duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21147.

If any district is appointed fiscal agent of or by the United States in connection with any Federal reclamation project, each officer shall execute an additional bond, in the sum required by the Secretary of the Interior, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duties of his office and the faithful discharge by the district of its duties under the appointment; and the bond may be sued upon by the United States or any person injured by the failure of the officer or the district to perform promptly and completely his or its respective duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Compensation [21165. - 21166.5.]

21165.

The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to all officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

21166.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a director, for sitting on the board or acting under its orders, shall receive both of the following:

(a) (1) Except as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3), compensation not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, not exceeding six days in any calendar month.

(2) In districts that produce or distribute electric power, one of the following methods of compensation:

(A) Compensation not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day.

(B) A monthly salary of not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month.

(C) Annual compensation not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). Any annual compensation pursuant to this subparagraph shall be fixed by the adoption of an ordinance pursuant to Sections 20203 to 20207, inclusive.

(3) Districts containing 500,000 acres or more are governed by Section 22840.

(b) Actual and necessary expenses when acting under the orders of the board.

For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

21166.5.
